Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1359
License; application; requirements; fee.

An applicant for an initial or renewal license as a crematory authority shall file a written application with the department. The application shall be accompanied by the license fee required under section 71-1363 and a certificate confirming that the crematory operator has attended, prior to issuance of the license, a training course provided by the Cremation Association of North America or by the manufacturer of the cremation chamber maintained and operated by the crematory authority and shall set forth the full name and address of the applicant, the address and location of the crematory, the name of the crematory operator, the name and address of the owner of the crematory, and additional information as required by the department, including affirmative evidence of the applicant's ability to comply with rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the Cremation of Human Remains Act. The application shall include the applicant's social security number if the applicant is an individual. The social security number shall not be public record and may only be used for administrative purposes.

Laws 2003, LB 95, § 5.